Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-1226
Simulcast facility license; application.

Any racetrack issued a license under sections 2-1201 to 2-1223 which operates at least one live race meet during each calendar year may apply to the commission for a simulcast facility license. An application for such license shall be in such form as may be prescribed by the commission and shall contain such information, material, or evidence as the commission may require. Any racetrack issued a simulcast facility license may display the simulcast of a horserace on which parimutuel wagering shall be allowed.

Laws 1987, LB 708, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1255, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 7.
July 1, 2026